Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 821.030 is amended to read:
821.030. For  purposes of the equipment requirements for off-road vehicles under ORS 821.040, the
[following agencies may establish the described equipment requirements for vehicles: ]
[(1) The Director of Transportation ] State Parks and  Recreation Department  may adopt rules
to do the following:
[(a)] (1)  Establish the type of brakes an off-road vehicle must be equipped with to be in compli-
ance with ORS 821.040.
[(b)] (2)  Establish the type of flag that must be used under ORS 821.040 on an off-road  vehicle
when it is operated on sand.
[(c)] (3) Require other safety equipment that must be used by off-road vehicles in order to comply
with ORS 821.040.
[(2)] (4) [ The Environmental Quality Commission may ] Adopt standards  for noise emissions of
mufflers that are required for off-road vehicles for compliance with ORS 821.040.
SECTION 2.  ORS 821.220 is amended to read:
821.220. (1) A person commits the offense of operating  an improperly equipped all-terrain vehicle
if the person operates any all-terrain vehicle without the following equipment:
(a) An adequate braking device that may be operated either by hand or foot.
(b) An adequate and operating muffling device that shall be maintained in good working  order
and in constant operation and shall effectively blend  the exhaust and motor noise in such a manner
so as to comply with all applicable noise emission standards established by the [ Department of En-
vironmental Quality ] State Parks and Recreation Department .
(2) The department [ of Environmental Quality ] shall establish procedures for  testing of noise
levels consistent with this section.
(3) All-terrain vehicles used in organized  racing events in an area designated for that purpose
shall comply with the  motor sports vehicles and facilities regulations of the department [ of Envi-
ronmental Quality].
(4) In addition to other penalties provided by this section, the owner or operator of an all-terrain
vehicle may be liable as provided under ORS 821.310.
(5) The offense  described in this section, operating an improperly equipped all-terrain vehicle,
is a Class C traffic violation.
Enrolled House Bill 2232 (HB 2232-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2232 (HB 2232-A) Page 2